Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 85. Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority.
Sec. 44.85.180.
Issuance of bonds and notes.

Subject to AS

44.85.100(b)

, the bond bank authority may issue its bonds or notes in principal amounts that it considers necessary to provide funds for any purposes under this chapter, including

the purchase of municipal bonds;

the making of loans through the purchase of municipal bonds, notes, or certificates of participation secured by an agreement between the bond bank authority and a municipality or a municipal joint insurance arrangement organized under AS 21.76;

the payment, funding, or refunding of the principal of, or interest or redemption premiums on, bonds or notes issued by it whether the bonds or notes or interest to be funded or refunded have or have not become due;

the establishment or increase of reserves to secure or to pay bonds or notes or interest on bonds or notes and all other costs or expenses of the bond bank authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers;

assisting governmental employers to prepay all or a portion of their share of the unfunded accrued actuarial liabilities of retirement systems, with security as the bond bank authority considers reasonable; however, to carry out this paragraph, bonds and other obligations may only be issued after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (f) of this section and if the state bond rating is the equivalent of AA- or better; bonds issued under this paragraph are subject to AS

37.15.903

.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or by the bond bank authority, every issue of bonds or notes shall be general obligations payable out of the revenues or funds of the bond bank authority, subject only to agreements with the holders of particular bonds or notes pledging a particular revenue or fund. Bonds or notes may be additionally secured by a pledge of a grant or contributions from the United States or the state or a political subdivision or a person, firm, or corporation, or a pledge of income or revenues, funds or money of the bond bank authority from any source whatsoever.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) and (b) of this section, the total amount of bond bank authority bonds and notes outstanding at any one time may not exceed $1,500,000,000. This subsection does not apply to

bonds or notes issued to fund or refund bonds or notes;

bonds, notes, commercial paper, and other obligations issued under AS

44.85.086

or (a)(5) of this section.

In deciding to purchase municipal bonds, the bond bank authority shall give preference to the entities referred to in AS

44.85.005

. In addition, the following, listed in order of preference, are preferred purposes of the municipal bonds that may be considered by the bond bank authority for purchase: schools, waste water treatment facilities, fire protection and public safety facilities, public health facilities, and public transportation facilities.

Notwithstanding (a), (b), and (c) of this section, the bond bank authority may issue its bonds or notes

in principal amounts not to exceed $87,500,000 for the purpose of making loans to the University of Alaska; and

in principal amounts not to exceed $205,000,000 at any one time for the purpose of making loans to a regional health organization; this paragraph does not apply to bonds or notes issued to fund or refund bonds or notes.

Before the issuance of bonds or other obligations under this section, the bond bank authority shall submit a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for review, and 45 days shall elapse before bonds or other obligations are issued, unless the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee earlier recommends that the bond bank authority proceed with the issuance. Should the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee recommend within the 45-day period that the bond bank authority not proceed with the issuance of bonds or other obligations, the bond bank authority shall again review the proposal, and, if the bond bank authority decides to issue the bonds or other obligations, the bond bank authority shall provide the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee with a statement of the bond bank authority’s reasons for doing so before issuance under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 41 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 1984; am § 9 ch 85 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 2006; am §§ 17, 18 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 68 SLA 2010; am §§ 5, 6 ch 24 SLA 2014; am §§ 6, 7 ch 28 SLA 2015; am §§ 12, 13 ch 109 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.180. Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 18, 2014, in the introductory language of (c), substituted “may not exceed $1,500,000,000” for “may not exceed $1,000,000,000”; added (e).

The 2015 amendment, effective May 27, 2015, in the first sentence of (d), deleted “of a municipality” following “purchase municipal bonds”, and substituted “entities” for “municipalities”; in (e), added (e)(2), and made a related change.

The 2018 amendment, effective December 26, 2018, in (a)(5), inserted “after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (f) of this section and” following “may only be issued”; added (f).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 68, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 269) relating to a proposed increase in the authorized amount of bonds that the bond bank may have outstanding and for related purposes affecting the bank’s authority involving municipal obligations, including reallocation of recovery zone economic development bond volume cap allocations under applicable provisions of P.L. 111-5 (American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009), see 2010 Senate Journal 1472 — 1474.

Sec. 44.85.190.
Form of issuance.

Bonds or notes of the bond bank authority shall be authorized by resolution of the bond bank authority and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear the date, mature at the time, bear interest at the rate of interest each year or within a maximum rate, be in the denomination, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the conversion or registration privileges, have the rank or priority, be executed in the manner, be payable from the sources in the medium of payment at the place inside or outside the state, and be subject to the terms of redemption, with or without premium, as the resolution of the bond bank authority provides.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.190. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.200.
Sale price.

Bonds or notes of the bond bank authority may be sold at public or private sale at the price the bond bank authority determines.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.200. Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Sec. 44.85.210.
Payment or refunding of notes.

The bond bank authority may from time to time issue its notes under this chapter and pay and retire or fund or refund the notes from proceeds of bonds or of other notes, or from other funds or money of the bond bank authority available for that purpose in accordance with a contract between the bond bank authority and the holders of the notes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.210. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.220.
Terms of agreement with the bondholder or noteholder.

In a resolution of the bond bank authority authorizing or relating to the issuance of bonds or notes, the bond bank authority, in order to secure the payment of the bonds or notes and in addition to its other powers, may covenant and contract with the holders of the bonds or notes

to pledge to a payment or purpose all or a part of its revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence, and the money derived from the revenues, and the proceeds of any bonds or notes;

to covenant against pledging all or a part of its revenues, or against permitting or suffering a lien on those revenues or its property;

to covenant as to the use and disposition of payments of principal or interest received by the bond bank authority on municipal bonds or other investments held by the bond bank authority;

to covenant as to establishment of reserves or sinking funds, the making of provision for them, and the regulation and disposition of the reserves or sinking funds;

to covenant with respect to or against limitations on a right to sell or otherwise dispose of property of any kind;

to covenant as to bonds or notes to be issued, and their limitations, terms, and conditions, and as to their custody, and as to the application and disposition of the proceeds of the bonds and notes;

to covenant as to issuance of additional bonds or notes or as to limitations on the issuance of additional bonds or notes and on the incurring of other debts by it;

to covenant as to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds or notes, as to the sources and methods of payment, as to the rank or priority of bonds or notes with respect to a lien or security, or as to the acceleration of the maturity of any bonds or notes;

to provide for the replacement of lost, stolen, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes;

to covenant against extending the time for the payment of bonds or notes or interest on the bonds or notes;

to covenant as to the redemption of bonds or notes and privileges of their exchange for other bonds or notes of the bond bank authority;

to covenant as to charges to be established and charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by charges or other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made of the charges or other revenues;

to covenant to create or authorize the creation of special funds or money to be held in pledge or otherwise for operating expenses, payment or redemption of bonds or notes, reserves or other purposes and as to the use and disposition of the money held in those funds;

to establish the procedure, if any, by which the terms of a contract or covenant with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds or notes may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent to amendment or abrogation, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

to covenant as to the custody of any of its property or investments, their safekeeping and insurance, and the use and disposition of insurance money;

to covenant as to the time or manner of enforcement or restraint from enforcement of any rights of the bond bank authority arising by reason of or with respect to nonpayment of the principal or interest of a municipal bond;

to provide for the rights and liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation and to prescribe the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds, notes, or other obligation of the bond bank authority become or may be declared due and payable before maturity and the terms and conditions upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived;

to vest in a trustee inside or outside the state such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the bond bank authority may determine, which may include any of the rights, powers, and duties of a trustee appointed by the holders of the bonds or notes, and to limit or abrogate the right of the holders of the bonds or notes of the bond bank authority to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limit the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;

to pay the costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the bonds or notes or of the resolution or of a covenant or agreement of the bond bank authority with the holders of its bonds or notes;

to agree with a corporate trustee which may be a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company inside or outside the state, as to the pledging or assigning of revenues or funds in which the bond bank authority has a right or interest, and may further provide for such other rights and remedies exercisable by the trustee as may be proper for the protection of the holders of bonds or notes of the bond bank authority and not otherwise in violation of law, and the agreement may also provide for the restriction of the rights of an individual holder of bonds or notes of the bond bank authority;

to appoint and to provide for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents, or other fiduciaries as the resolution may provide inside or outside the state;

to limit the rights of the holders of bonds or notes to enforce a pledge or covenant securing bonds or notes; and

to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized in this section, of like or different character, and to make covenants to do or refrain from doing acts and things as may be necessary, or convenient and desirable, in order to better secure bonds or notes or which, in the absolute discretion of the bond bank authority, will tend to make bonds or notes more marketable, notwithstanding that the covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.220. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.230.
Purchase and disposition of own obligations.

The bond bank authority may purchase bonds or notes of the bond bank authority out of its funds or money available for the purchase of its own bonds and notes. The bond bank authority may hold, cancel, or resell the bonds or notes subject to and in accordance with agreements with holders of its bonds or notes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.230. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.240.
Bond anticipation notes.

Notwithstanding any law applicable to a municipality as to the period for temporary financing of a public improvement or purpose by issuance of its notes in anticipation of the issuance of permanent bonds or as to the renewal of bond anticipation notes, the bond bank authority may purchase and the municipality may issue bond anticipation notes and may renew them from time to time; however, the bond anticipation notes, including renewals, shall mature in such amounts and in such years not exceeding five years from the date of the original issuance as is agreed between the bond bank authority and the municipality.
In connection with the transaction and purchase of bond anticipation notes, the bond bank authority may by agreement with the municipality impose any terms, conditions, and limitations as in its opinion are proper for the purposes and security of the bond bank authority and the holders of its bonds or notes.
The failure of a municipality to comply with the agreement constitutes a failure of the municipality to pay principal of and interest on the bonds or notes, and the bond bank authority shall enforce all rights, remedies, and provisions of law as it has under this chapter or are elsewhere provided.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.240. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.250.
Documentation.

All municipal bonds purchased, held, or owned by the bond bank authority, upon delivery to the bond bank authority, must be accompanied by all documentation required by the authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.250. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.260.
Presumption of validity.

After issuance, all bonds or notes of the bond bank authority shall be conclusively presumed to be fully authorized and issued under the laws of the state, and a person or a municipality is estopped from questioning their authorization, sale, issuance, execution, or delivery by the bond bank authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.260. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.270.
Reserve fund.

The bond bank authority shall establish and maintain a special fund called the “Alaska municipal bond bank authority reserve fund” in which there shall be deposited or transferred

all money appropriated by the legislature for the purpose of the fund in accordance with the provisions of (g) of this section;

all proceeds of bonds required to be deposited in the fund by terms of a contract between the bond bank authority and its bondholders or a resolution of the bond bank authority with respect to the proceeds of bonds;

all other money appropriated by the legislature to the reserve fund; and

any other money or funds of the bond bank authority that it decides to deposit in the fund.

Subject to the provisions of (h) of this section, money in the reserve fund shall be held and applied solely to the payment of the interest on and principal of bonds of the bond bank authority as the interest and principal become due and payable and for the retirement of bonds; and the money may not be withdrawn if a withdrawal would reduce the amount in the reserve fund to an amount less than the required debt service reserve except for payment of interest then due and payable on bonds and the principal of bonds then maturing and payable and for the retirement of bonds in accordance with the terms of a contract between the bond bank authority and its bondholders and for which payments of other money of the bond bank authority is not then available. In this subsection, “required debt service reserve” means, as of the date of computation, the amount required to be on deposit in the reserve fund as provided by resolution of the bond bank authority.

Money in the reserve fund in excess of the required debt service reserve as defined in (b) of this section, whether by reason of investment or otherwise, may be withdrawn at any time by the bond bank authority and transferred to another fund or account of the bond bank authority subject to the provision of (h) of this section.

Money in the reserve fund may be invested in the same manner and on the same conditions as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the state or held in the treasury under AS

37.10.070

; however, the authority may agree with the bondholders to further limit these investments.

For purposes of valuation, investments in the reserve fund shall be valued at par or if purchased at less than par, at cost unless otherwise provided by resolution of the bond bank authority. Valuation on a particular date shall include the amount of interest then earned or accrued to that date on the money or investments in the reserve fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, bonds may not be issued by the bond bank authority unless there is in the reserve fund the required debt service reserve for all bonds then issued and outstanding and for the bonds to be issued; however, the bond bank authority may satisfy this requirement by depositing as much of the proceeds of the bonds to be issued, upon their issuance, as is needed to meet the required debt service reserve. The bond bank authority may at any time issue its bonds or notes for the purpose of increasing the amount in the reserve fund to the required debt service reserve, or to meet whatever higher or additional reserve that may be fixed by the bond bank authority with respect to the fund.

In order to assure the maintenance of the required debt service reserve in the reserve fund, the legislature may appropriate annually to the bond bank authority for deposit in the fund the sum, certified by the chairman of the bond bank authority to the governor and to the legislature, that is necessary to restore the fund to an amount equal to the required debt service reserve. The chairman annually, before January 30, shall make and deliver to the governor and to the legislature a certificate stating the sum required to restore the fund to that amount, and the sum so certified may be appropriated and paid to the bond bank authority during the then current state fiscal year. Nothing in this subsection creates a debt or liability of the state.

All amounts received on account of money appropriated to the reserve fund referred to in (a)(3) of this section shall be held and applied in accordance with (b) of this section; however, at the end of each fiscal year, if the amount in the reserve fund is in excess of the required debt service reserve, any amount representing earnings or income received on account of money appropriated to the reserve fund that exceeds the operating expenses of the authority for that fiscal year shall be transferred to the general fund of the state.

All references to the “reserve fund” in this section include special accounts within the reserve fund which may be created by the authority to secure the payment of particular bonds. The commissioner of revenue may lend surplus money in the general fund to the authority for deposit to any account in the reserve fund in an amount equal to the required debt service reserve. The loans shall be made on such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the commissioner of revenue and the authority, including, without limitation, terms and conditions providing that the loans need not be repaid until the obligations of the corporation secured and to be secured by the account in the reserve fund are no longer outstanding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 143 SLA 1978; am § 77 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 42 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.270. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.280.
Additional funds and accounts.

The bond bank authority may establish additional reserves or other funds or accounts as may be, in its discretion, necessary, desirable, or convenient to further the accomplishment of its purposes or to comply with the provisions of any of its agreements or resolutions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.280. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.290.
Application of funds.

Money or investments in a fund or account of the bond bank authority established or held for bonds, notes, indebtedness, or liability to be paid, funded, or refunded by issuance of bonds or notes, unless the resolution authorizing the bonds or notes provides otherwise, shall be applied to the payment or retirement of the bonds, notes, indebtedness or liability, and to no other purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.290. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.300.
Rights of holders paramount.

In order to carry out its purpose under this chapter of making loans to municipalities by purchase of the municipal bonds of those municipalities and by receipt of its income from service charges and from payments of interest on the maturing principal of municipal bonds purchased and held by it, and in order to produce revenues or income to the bond bank authority sufficient at all times to meet its costs and expenses of operation under this chapter and to pay the principal of and interest on its outstanding bonds and notes when due, the bond bank authority must at all times, and to the greatest extent possible, plan to issue its bonds and notes and lend money to political subdivisions so that the purpose is achieved without in any way jeopardizing any rights of the holders of bonds or notes of the bond bank authority or affecting other matters under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.300. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.310.
Default in payment; appointment of trustee.

If the bond bank authority defaults in the payment of principal or interest on an issue of notes or bonds after they become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and the default continues for 30 days, or if the bond bank authority fails or refuses to comply with this chapter or defaults in an agreement made with the holders of an issue of notes or bonds, the holders of 25 percent in the aggregate principal amount of the outstanding notes or bonds of that issue, by instrument filed in the office of the clerk of the district court of the first judicial district and executed in the same manner as a deed to be recorded, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of those notes or bonds for the purposes provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.310. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.320.
Powers and duties of trustee on default.

A trustee appointed under AS

44.85.310

may, and shall in the trustee’s name, upon written request of the holders of 25 percent in principal amount of the outstanding notes or bonds,

by civil action enforce all rights of the noteholders or bondholders, including the right to require the bond bank authority to collect rates, charges, and other fees and to collect interest and amortization payments on municipal bonds and notes held by it adequate to carry out an agreement as to, or pledge of, the rates, charges, and other fees and of the interest and amortization payments, and to require the bond bank authority to carry out any other agreements with the holders of the notes or bonds and to perform its duties under this chapter;

bring a civil action upon the notes or bonds;

by civil action require the bond bank authority to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of the notes or bonds;

by civil action enjoin anything that may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of the notes or bonds;

declare all the notes or bonds due and payable, and if all defaults are made good, then with the consent of the holders of 25 percent of the principal amount of the outstanding notes or bonds, annul the declaration and its consequences;

in addition to the foregoing, exercise all the powers necessary for the exercise of functions specifically set out or incident to the general representation of bondholders or noteholders in the enforcement and protection of their rights.

Before declaring the principal of notes or bonds due and payable, the trustee must first give 30 days’ notice in writing to the governor, the bond bank authority, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, and the attorney general of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 22 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.320. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “community and regional affairs” was changed to “community and economic development” in accordance with § 91(a)(12), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.85.330.
Personal liability.

Neither a member of the bond bank authority nor a person executing bonds or notes issued under this chapter is liable personally on the bonds or notes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.330. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.340.
Exemption from execution and sale.

All property of the bond bank authority is exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution and no execution or other judicial process may issue against the property.
A judgment against the bond bank authority may not be a charge or lien upon its property; however, nothing in this section applies to or limits the rights of the holder of bonds or notes to pursue a remedy for the enforcement of a pledge or lien given by the bond bank authority on its revenues or other money.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.340. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.350.
Lien of pledge.

A pledge of revenues or other money made by the bond bank authority is binding from the time the pledge is made. Revenues or other money so pledged and thereafter received by the bond bank authority are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without any further act, and the lien of a pledge is binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the bond bank authority, regardless of whether the parties have notice of the lien. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created needs to be filed or recorded except in the records of the bond bank authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.350. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.360.
Insurance or guaranty.

The bond bank authority may obtain from a department or agency of the United States, or a nongovernmental insurer available insurance or guaranty for the payment or repayment of interest or principal, or both, or any part of interest or principal, on bonds or notes issued by the bond bank authority, or on municipal bonds of municipalities purchased or held by the bond bank authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.360. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.370.
Surety for deposits by bank.

All banks, trust companies, savings banks, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business are authorized to give to the bond bank authority a good and sufficient undertaking with such sureties as are approved by the bank to the effect that the bank or banking institution shall faithfully keep and pay over to the order of or upon the warrant of the bond bank authority or its authorized agent all those funds deposited with it by the bank and agreed interest under or by reason of this chapter, at such times or upon such demands as may be agreed with the bank or in lieu of these sureties, deposit with the bond bank authority or its authorized agent or a trustee or for the holders of bonds, as collateral, those securities as the bond bank authority may approve.
The deposits of the bond bank authority may be evidenced by an agreement in the form and upon the terms and conditions that may be agreed upon by the bond bank authority and the depository bank or banking institution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.370. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.380.
Expenses of administration.

All expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter are payable solely from revenues or funds appropriated under this chapter and nothing in this chapter authorizes the bond bank authority to incur an indebtedness or liability on behalf of or payable by the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.380. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.390.
Cooperation by government agencies.

All officers, departments, boards, agencies, divisions, and commissions of the state shall render services to the bond bank authority that are within the area of their respective governmental functions and that may be requested by the bond bank authority and must comply promptly with any reasonable request by the bond bank authority relating to making of a study or review as to desirability, need, cost or expense, or financial feasibility with respect to a public project, purpose, or improvement, or the financial or fiscal responsibility or ability of a political subdivision making application for loan to the bond bank authority and for the purchase by the bond bank authority of municipal bonds to be issued by that municipality. The cost and expense of a service requested by the bond bank authority, at the request of the officer, department, board, agency, division, or commission rendering the service, shall be paid by the bond bank authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.390. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.400.
Public records; open meetings.

The provisions of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

(public records) and AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act) apply to the bond bank authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.400. Renumbered in 1980.

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.312

(agency public meetings)” in accordance with § 29(3), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 44.85.410.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“bond bank authority” means the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority established by AS

44.85.020

;

“bonds” means bonds of the bond bank authority issued under this chapter;

“governmental employer” means the State of Alaska or a municipality or other state or municipal governmental entity within the state, including an agency, instrumentality, district, school district, public corporation, department, division, or other subdivision of the state or of a municipality, in its capacity as an employer;

“municipal bond” means a bond or note or evidence of debt that constitutes

a general obligation bond that is a direct and general obligation of a political subdivision of the state, all the taxable property within which is subject to taxation to pay the bond, note, or evidence of debt, and the interest without limitation, as to rate or amount generally to the extent permitted by law or to avoid a default as provided for second class cities under AS

29.45.590

;

a revenue bond issued by a municipality, the University of Alaska, a regional health organization, a joint action agency formed under AS

42.45.310

, a solid waste management authority, or a port authority that pledges the revenue of a revenue-producing capital improvement and that is payable solely from the revenue of the revenue-producing capital improvement;

a general obligation bond or revenue bond combined or additionally secured;

a bond of a borough issued as a general obligation of a service area under AS

29.47.440

or former AS 29.58.340; or

an obligation of a municipality secured only by

special assessments on benefited property;

tax increments and a letter of credit or equal security; or

a lease;

“notes” means notes of the bond bank authority issued under this chapter;

“public body” means a public body corporate and politic or a political subdivision of the state established under any law of the state which may issue municipal bonds;

“regional health organization” has the meaning given in AS

18.28.100

;

“reserve fund” means the Alaska municipal bond bank reserve fund established under AS

44.85.270

;

“revenues” means all fees, charges, money, profits, payments of principal of or interest on municipal bonds and other investments, gifts, grants, contributions, appropriations, and all other income derived or to be derived by the bond bank authority under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 23 SLA 1980; am §§ 78, 79, 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 118 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 97 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 26 SLA 2006; am § 19 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 4 ch 68 SLA 2010; am § 7 ch 24 SLA 2014; am §§ 8, 9 ch 28 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.410; renumbered in 1980.
Paragraph (3) was enacted as (8); renumbered in 2008, at which time conforming changes were made to other paragraphs.
Paragraph (7) was enacted as (9); renumbered in 2015, at which time conforming changes were made to other paragraphs.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 12, 2010, in (4)(B), deleted “, except a revenue bond for electrical generation purposes other than diesel-powered generation,” following “a revenue bond”; in (4)(E)(iii), deleted “for equipment or building improvements if the state is not a lessee” following “a lease”.

The 2014 amendment, effective June 18, 2014, in (4)(B), inserted “the University of Alaska,” following “issued by a municipality,”.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 27, 2015, in (4)(B), inserted “a regional health organization, a joint action agency formed under AS

42.45.310

,” following “the University of Alaska,”; added (9) [now (7)].

Sec. 44.85.420.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority Act or the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Act.
In transactions involving general obligation bonds of municipalities, the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority created by this chapter may be referred to as the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank with the same legal effect as if the reference were to Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 48 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.420. Renumbered in 1980.